Wisconsin, session 2025, AB750.
do enact as follows:AB750,1Section 1. 38.22 (5) of the statutes is renumbered 38.22 (5) (a) and amended to read:38.22 (5) (a) The Subject to par. (b), the board shall promulgate rules establishing the priority to be given by a district board in admitting students who are residents of the district, students who are not residents of the district but are residents of this state, and students who are not residents of this state.AB750,2Section 2. 38.22 (5) (b) of the statutes is created to read:38.22 (5) (b) 1. Notwithstanding the board’s rules under par. (a), and subject to approval by the board, a district board may adopt a policy to reserve program spaces to accommodate admission of students in special circumstances. Factors that may be considered for special circumstance admission include hardship, school-to-work program participation, special need, school partnerships with employers, and enrollment diversity.2. Notwithstanding the board’s rules under par. (a), a district board may adopt a policy to reserve program spaces to accommodate admission of students in protective services programs, including programs that prepare students to provide law enforcement, paramedic, emergency medical technician, or firefighting services, who are sponsored by an employer that provides protective services in the district of which the district board is in charge. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab750 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab750 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB750 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB750 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB750: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting